Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5962.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-12-22.4 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-12 entitled
"Indebtedness of Towns and Cities" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-12-22.4. Deficit, pension and other post-employment benefit financing — Approval
required.
(a) Except as provided in chapter 9 of this title, no municipality shall sell a long-term bond
in order to fund a deficit or to fund pension obligations or other post-employment benefits without
prior approval by the state auditor general and director of the state department of revenue.
(1) Any municipality or quasi-public agency that has not made its annual contribution to
its other post-employment benefits trust or if the trust is less than thirty-five percent (35%) funded,
shall file an annual report with the department of municipal finance setting forth:
(i) A plan to make its trust payment within three (3) years; or
(ii) A plan to get the trust funded to at least the thirty-five percent (35%) level within ten
(10) years.
(b) If any provision of this section or the application thereof shall for any reason be judged
invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder of the law, but shall be
confined in its effect to the provisions or application directly involved in the controversy giving
rise to the judgment.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001621
========
LC001621 - Page 2 of 3